Idaho, session 2025, S1059.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. (1) This act shall be known and may be
cited as the "Idaho Prenatal Equal Protection Act."
(2) Acknowledging the sanctity of innocent human life, created in the
image of God, the purpose of this act is to:
(a) Follow the Constitution of the United States, which requires that
"no state shall... deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal
protection of the laws";
(b) Follow the Constitution of the State of Idaho, which provides in Ar-
ticle I, Section 2 that the government is instituted for the "equal pro-
tection" of the people;
(c) Protect the lives of preborn persons with the same criminal and
civil laws protecting the lives of born persons by removing provisions
that enable the commission of willful prenatal homicide and assault;
and
(d) Remove provisions that could be interpreted to allow a person to
pressure a pregnant mother to abort her child and, therefore, secure the
right to life and equal protection of the laws to all preborn children
from the moment of fertilization and to protect pregnant mothers.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 3, Title 5, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 5-311A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
5-311A. APPLICATION TO PREBORN CHILD. (1) For the purposes of section
5-311, Idaho Code, "person" includes a preborn child.
(2) "Preborn child" means a living human being before birth from the be-
ginning of biological development at the moment of fertilization upon the
fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.


(3) The provisions of this section are prospective only and shall not
apply to any act or neglect committed prior to the effective date of this sec-
tion. For the purposes of this section, an act, neglect, or default occurred
before the effective date of this section if any element of the act occurred
before such date.
SECTION 3. That Section 18-907, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-907. AGGRAVATED BATTERY DEFINED. (1) A person commits aggravated
battery who, in committing battery:
(a) Causes great bodily harm, permanent disability or permanent dis-
figurement; or
(b) Uses a deadly weapon or instrument; or
(c) Uses any vitriol, corrosive acid, or a caustic chemical of any na-
ture; or
(d) Uses any poison or other noxious or destructive substance or liq-
uid; or
(e) Upon On the person of a pregnant female, causes great bodily harm,
permanent disability or permanent disfigurement to an embryo or fetus.
(2) For purposes of this section the terms "embryo" or "fetus" shall
mean any human in utero.
(3) There shall be no prosecution under subsection (1)(e) of this sec-
tion:
(a) Of any person for conduct relating to an abortion for which the con-
sent of the pregnant female, or person authorized by law to act on her
behalf, has been obtained or for which such consent is implied by law.
(b) Of any person for any medical treatment of the pregnant female or
her embryo or fetus; or
(c) Of any female with respect to her embryo or fetus.
(4) (2) Nothing in this chapter is intended to amend or nullify the pro-
visions of chapter 6, title 18, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 9, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-926, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-926. DEFINITION OF HUMAN EMBRYO AND FETUS -- APPLICATION. (1) For
purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Embryo" or "fetus" means a preborn child.
(b) "Preborn child" means a living human being before birth from the be-
ginning of biological development at the moment of fertilization upon
the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.
(2) Enforcement for a preborn child pursuant to this chapter shall be
subject to the same presumptions, defenses, justifications, immunities, and
clemencies as would apply to the homicide of a human being who had been born
alive.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the unintentional
death of a preborn child when resulting from:


(a) The undertaking of life-saving procedures to save the life of a
mother when accompanied by reasonable steps, if available, to save the
life of her preborn child; or
(b) A spontaneous miscarriage.
(4) In accordance with section 16, article I of the constitution of the
state of Idaho, and section 9, article I, clause 3 of the constitution of the
United States, the provisions of this section shall be prospective only and
shall not apply to any act committed prior to the effective date of this sec-
tion. For the purposes of this section, an act occurred before the effective
date of this section if any element of the act occurred before such date.
(5) The provisions of this section shall prevail over other laws to the
extent of any conflict.
SECTION 5. That Section 18-4016, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 40, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-4018, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-4018. DEFINITION OF HUMAN EMBRYO AND FETUS -- APPLICATION. (1) For
purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Embryo" or "fetus" means a preborn child.
(b) "Preborn child" means a living human being before birth from the be-
ginning of biological development at the moment of fertilization upon
the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.
(2) Enforcement for a preborn child pursuant to this chapter shall be
subject to the same presumptions, defenses, justifications, immunities, and
clemencies as would apply to the homicide of a human being who had been born
alive.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the unintentional
death of a preborn child when resulting from:
(a) The undertaking of life-saving procedures to save the life of a
mother when accompanied by reasonable steps, if available, to save the
life of her preborn child; or
(b) A spontaneous miscarriage.
(4) In accordance with section 16, article I of the constitution of the
state of Idaho, and section 9, article I, clause 3 of the constitution of the
United States, the provisions of this section shall be prospective only and
shall not apply to any act committed prior to the effective date of this sec-
tion. For the purposes of this section, an act occurred before the effective
date of this section if any element of the act occurred before such date.
(5) The provisions of this section shall prevail over other laws to the
extent of any conflict.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.